src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/myv-test-V-kundams_all_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлитькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэльгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидеяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэльтькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлияяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэликкак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлизеяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлитькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундыксэлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимиккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимимгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Foc/Add: кундындерямскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерянгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+Foc/Add: кундындеряткак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+Foc/Add: кундындеряйгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерятанояк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадояк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+Foc/Add: кундындеряйтькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерясаяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерясаккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерясыяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерясыньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерясытькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерясынзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерясынеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерясынеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерясынккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерясынккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерясызьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерясызьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерятангак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерятанзаткак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамаккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамамгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+Foc/Add: кундындериньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+Foc/Add: кундындеритькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+Foc/Add: кундындеряськак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+Foc/Add: кундындеринеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+Foc/Add: кундындеридеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерястькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерияяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындериккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындеризеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындериньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындеритькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындеринзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындеринеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындеринеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындеринккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындеринккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындеризьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындеризьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындеритиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындеринзитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындеримиккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындеримимгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+Foc/Add: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+Foc/Add: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+Foc/Add: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+Foc/Add: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+Foc/Add: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+Foc/Add: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерилияяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындериликкак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерилизеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерилиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерилитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерилинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерилинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерилинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерилинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерилинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерилизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерилизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерилитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерилинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерилидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимиккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимимгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерилимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявольгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявольтькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлияяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявликкак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлизеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Add: кундындерявлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Add: кундындерявлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимиккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимимгак
